Oklahoma, session 2026, SB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.416 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes an amount equal to qualified


fees required for an individual taxpayer to obtain and renew a


license or certification in an occupation, when the license or


certification is required by state law to work in this state. For


the purposes of this section, “qualified fees” shall include any



Req. No. 1422 Page 1


fees or other charges established by rule or statute which are


assessed by an entity:


1. With the statutory duty for administering an examination,


conferring a license or certification, or renewing a license or


certification; or


2. Which provides continuing education courses required by


state law in order to maintain an existing license or certification.


For purposes of this subsection, an entity may include a third


party which administers examinations, provides continuing education,


or provides services necessary to meet the statutory requirements


for licensing, certification, or renewal.


B. In order to claim the tax credit authorized by subsection A


of this section, a taxpayer shall:


1. Be required to provide such documentation as may be


determined by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to verify the amount of


fees paid; and


2. Not have been subject to license suspension or revocation


during the tax year for which the credit is claimed.


C. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1422 QD 12/31/2024 12:36:54 PM



Req. No. 1422 Page 2